District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.47

Permits; issuance.

(a)

Permits to engage in the practice of certified public accounting in the District shall be issued by the Board to holders of licenses as certified public accountants issued by the Board who have furnished evidence satisfactory to the Board of compliance with the renewal requirements of this subchapter and to persons or firms as required by this subchapter.

(b)

Repealed.

(c)

Holders of licenses issued by the Board may be required as a condition of the issuance of a permit pursuant to this section to demonstrate, in accordance with the regulations issued by the Board, experience of not fewer than 2 years in either:

(1)

Auditing books and accounts of other persons in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards;

(2)

Reviewing financial statements and supporting material covering the financial conditions and operations of private business entities to determine the reliability and fairness of the financial reporting and compliance with generally accepted accounting principles;

(3)

Such other experience including auditing and accounting experience in a governmental agency as the Board in its discretion regards as qualifying experience; or

(4)

Any combination of paragraphs (1) through (3) of this subsection.

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
June 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-130, § 2(h), 53 DCR 4718
Dec. 2, 2011, D.C. Law 19-43, § 2(f), 58 DCR 8928

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-2853.01, § 47-2853.43, § 47-2853.44, and § 47-2853.49.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2853.47.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-130, in subsec. (a), substituted “certified public accounting” for “public accounting”.
D.C. Law 19-43 repealed subsec. (b), which read as follows: “(b) To be eligible for permits all offices in the District of the certificate holder or registrant must be maintained and registered as required by this subchapter.”

Temporary Legislation

Section 2(i) of D.C. Law 16-101, in par. (a), substituted “certified public accounting” for “public accounting”.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 16-101 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(i) of Non-Health Related Occupations and Professions Licensure Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-255, January 26, 2006, 53 DCR 763).

Editor's Notes

Section 3 of D.C. Law 19-43 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan. D.C. Law 19-43, § 3, was repealed by D.C. Law 19-168, § 7010.